Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 22 Soil Amendments

2-22-1.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island soil amendment law”.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-2.
Responsibility for administration.

This chapter shall be administered by the director of the department of environmental management, referred to as the director.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Brand” means the term, designation, trade mark, product name or other specific designation under which individual soil amendments are offered for sale.

“Bulk” means in nonpackaged form.

“Compost” means a soil amending material resulting from the aerobic, thermophyllic, microbial processing of organic materials.

“Composter” means a producer of compost registered with the director under this chapter.

“Composting” means any aerobic, thermophyllic process which allows for the conversion of raw organic materials into a stable soil amendment.

“Distribute” means to import, consign, manufacture, produce, compound, mix or blend soil amendments or offer for sale, sell, barter, or otherwise supply soil amendments in this state.

“Distributor” means any person who imports, consigns, manufactures, produces, compounds, mixes, or blends soil amendments, or who offers for sale, sells, barters, or otherwise supplies soil amendments in this state.

“Investigational allowance” means an allowance for variations inherent in the taking, preparation and analysis of an official sample of soil amendment.

“Label” means the display of all written, printed or graphic matter upon the immediate container or statement accompanying a soil amendment.

“Labeling” means all written, printed or graphic matter, upon or accompanying any soil amendment, or advertisements, brochures, posters, or television or radio announcements used in promoting the sale of any soil amendments.

“Minimum percentage” means that percent of soil amending ingredient that must be present in a product before the product will be accepted for registration when mentioned in any form or manner.

“Official sample” means any sample of soil amendment taken by the director or his or her agent and designated as official by the director.

“Other ingredients” means the nonsoil amending ingredients present in soil amendments.

“Percent” or “Percentage” means by weight.

“Person” means individual, partnership, association, firm or corporation.

“Registrant” means the person who registers soil amendments under the provisions of this chapter.

“Soil amending ingredient” means a substance which improves the physical characteristics of the soil.

“Soil amendment” means any substance which is intended to improve the physical characteristics of the soil, except commercial fertilizers, agricultural liming materials, unmanipulated animal manures, unmanipulated vegetable manures, unmanipulated natural
substances (charcoal, sand, pumice, and clay, etc.), pesticides, and other material exempted by regulation.

“Soil ingredient form” means the chemical compound such as salt, chelate, oxide, acid, etc., of an ingredient or the physical form of an ingredient.

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois.

“Weight” means the weight of material as offered for sale.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 1.

2-22-4.
Labeling.

Soil amendment labels — the following information shall appear on the face or display side in a readable and conspicuous form, and is considered the label:

Net weight

Brand Name

Guaranteed analysis

Purpose of product

Direction for application

Name and address of the registrant.

No information or statement shall appear on any package, label, delivery slip or advertising matter which is false or misleading to the purchaser as to the use, value, quality, analysis, type or composition of the soil amendment.

The director may require proof of claims made for any soil amendment. If no claims are made he or she may require proof of usefulness and value of the soil amendments. For evidence of proof the director of environmental management may rely on experimental
data, evaluations, or advice supplied from such sources as the dean of the college of resource development. The experimental design shall be related to Rhode Island conditions for which the product is intended. The director may
accept or reject other sources of proof as additional evidence in evaluating soil amendments.

No soil amending ingredient may be listed or guaranteed on the labels or labeling of soil amendments without the permission of the director. The director may allow a soil amending ingredient to be listed or guaranteed on the label or labeling if satisfactory
supportive data is provided to the director to substantiate the value and usefulness of the soil amending ingredients. The director may rely on outside sources such as the director of the agricultural experiment station for assistance
in evaluating the data submitted. When a soil amending ingredient is permitted to be listed or guaranteed it must be determinable by laboratory methods and is subject to inspection and analysis. The director may prescribe methods
and procedures of inspection and analysis of the soil amending ingredient. The director may stipulate by regulation, the quantities of the soil amending ingredient or soil amending ingredients required in soil amendments.

The director may allow labeling by volume rather than weight in the packaging of soil amendments.

Soil amending ingredients Name and source of ingredient% and continued until all soil amending ingredients are listed and percentages given. Total percent of other ingredients

Click to view

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 1.

2-22-5.
Registration — Tonnage report and fee.

Each separately identified product shall be registered before being distributed in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted to the director of environmental management on forms furnished or approved by the director and be accompanied
by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per product. Upon approval by the director, a certified copy of the registration shall be furnished to the applicant. All registrations expire on December 31st of each year. Each manufacturer
shall submit to the director a copy of labels and advertising literature with the registration request for each soil amendment.

A distributor is not required to register any brand of soil amendment which is already registered under this chapter by another person, providing that the label does not differ in any respect.

Before registering any soil amendment, the director may require evidence to substantiate the claims made for the soil amendment and proof of the value and usefulness of the soil amendment and of any process step during composting deemed essential to the
safety of the soil amendment as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of §

2-22-4

.

The director may by regulation set the minimum amount of a soil amending ingredient and soil amending ingredients that must be present before a soil amendment can be registered and sold.

The director may through promulgation of regulations require a tonnage fee and/or tonnage report annually. If required, the tonnage fee and tonnage report may be made on a calculated equivalent of volume to tons on brands labeled by volume rather than
weight.

The composter is required to register the operation with the director and shall identify their organic and any inorganic inputs and processes used in the making of their compost. The director shall set forth rules and regulations delineating the organic
inputs allowed under the following compost designations and shall collect the appropriate registration fee for the compost operation. Compost classes are:

Horticultural grade, general use, one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per year;

Horticultural grade, mixed source general use, three hundred dollars ($300) per year;

Non-food crop use, one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year; and

Limited landscape use, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 1.

2-22-6.
Inspection, sampling, analysis.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management, who may act through his or her authorized agent, to sample, inspect, make analyses, and test soil amendments distributed within the state at any time and place and to any extent he or she may
deem necessary to determine whether the soil amendments are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The director, individually or through his or her agent, is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or
carriers during regular business hours in order to have access to soil amendments subject to the provisions of the chapter and the rules and regulations pertaining to soil amendments, and to the records relating to their distribution.

The methods of analysis and sampling shall be those adopted by the director from sources such as the association of official analytical chemists, or other sources acceptable to the director.

The results of official analyses of soil amendments and portions of official samples shall be distributed by the director as provided in the regulations.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-7.
Penalties for deficient analysis.

If the analysis shows that any soil amendment falls short of the guaranteed analysis in any one soil amending ingredient or in total soil amending ingredients, a penalty shall be assessed in favor of the department in accordance with the following provisions:

A penalty of three (3) times the value of the deficiency if the deficiency in any one soil amending ingredient is more than:

Twenty percent (20%) of the guarantee on any one soil amendment in which the soil amending ingredient is guaranteed up to and including twenty percent (20%);

Four percent (4%) under guarantee on any one soil amendment in which the soil amending ingredient is guaranteed twenty and one-tenth percent (201/10%) and above;

A penalty of three (3) times the value of the total soil amending ingredients deficiency is assessed when the total deficiency is more than two percent (2%) under the calculated total soil amending ingredient guarantee;

When a soil amendment is subject to penalty under both subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, only the larger penalty is assessed.

All penalties assessed under this section shall be paid to the director of environmental management within three (3) months after the date of notice from the director to the registrant. The penalty shall be deposited into the general treasury.

Nothing contained in this section prevents any person from appealing to a court of competent jurisdiction for a judgment as to the justification of any penalties imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

The penalties payable in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall in no manner be construed as limiting the consumer’s right to bring a civil action in damage against the registrant paying those civil penalties.

For the purpose of determining commercial values to be applied under the provisions of this section, the director shall determine from the registrant’s sales invoice the values charged for the soil amending ingredients. If no invoice is available, or
if the invoice fails to provide sufficient information, the director may use other methods to determine values. The values determined shall be used in determining and assessing penalties.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-8.
Misbranding.

No person shall distribute a misbranded soil amendment. A soil amendment is deemed to be misbranded if:

Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

It is distributed under the name of another soil amendment;

It is not labeled as required in §§

2-22-4

and

2-22-5

and in accordance with regulations prescribed under this chapter;

It purports to be or is represented as a soil amendment, unless that soil amendment conforms to the definitions of identity, if any, prescribed by regulation of the director of environmental management; in the adopting of those regulations, the director
shall give due regard to commonly accepted definitions and official terms such as those issued by the association of American plant food control officials; or

It does not conform to ingredient form, minimums, labeling and investigational allowances in the regulations adopted by the director.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-9.
Stop sale, use, or removal orders.

The director of environmental management may issue and enforce a written or printed stop sale, use, or removal order to the owner or custodian of any lot of soil amendment and to hold at a designated place when the director finds the soil amendment is
being offered or exposed for sale in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter until the law has been complied with and the soil amendment is released in writing by the director, or the violation has been otherwise legally
disposed of by written authority. The director shall release the soil amendment withdrawn when the requirements of the provisions of the chapter are complied with and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the withdrawn
soil amendment have been paid.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-10.
Penalties for violations.

Any person convicted of violating any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter is subject to a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100). The penalty shall not be greater than five thousand dollars
($5,000) or in addition to the penalty, the violator’s registration fee shall be increased four hundred percent (400%) for the four (4) years subsequent to the penalty. All penalties shall be enforced by a summary proceeding in
a court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director of environmental management or his or her authorized agent to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure proceedings
as a result of minor violations of the chapter when he or she believes that the public interest will best be served by a suitable written warning.

The director is authorized to apply for and the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under the chapter
notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction to be issued without bond.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 1.

2-22-11.
Rules and regulations.

The director of environmental management is authorized pursuant to publication and notice to adopt and enforce rules and regulations relating to sampling, analytical methods, form, minimum percentages, soil amending ingredients, exempted materials, investigational
allowances, definitions, records, labels, labeling, liability bond, misbranding, mislabeling, and the distribution of soil amendments as may be necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of this chapter. The director
of environmental management is authorized and empowered to adopt and enforce rules and regulations to waive registration and fee requirements for agricultural, municipal and other compost facilities based upon the size of operation,
volume and composition of material being composted.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 287, § 1.

2-22-12.
Adulteration.

No person shall distribute an adulterated soil amendment. A soil amendment is deemed to be adulterated if:

It contains any deleterious or harmful agent in sufficient amount to render it injurious to beneficial plant, animal, or aquatic life when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label, or contains false or misleading information regarding
input materials or production process, or if adequate warning statements and directions for use, which may be necessary to protect plant, animal, or aquatic life are not shown upon the label;

If its composition falls below or differs from that which it is purported to possess by its labeling; or

If it contains unwanted crop or weed seed, or primary noxious or secondary noxious weed seed.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 1.

2-22-13.
Cancellation or refusal of registration.

The director of environmental management is authorized and empowered to refuse registration of any brand of soil amendment if he or she finds the brand of soil amendment violates any section of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under
this chapter. The director is authorized and empowered to cancel the registration of any brand of soil amendment upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant has used fraudulent or deceptive practices in the evasion or attempted
evasions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations promulgated under this chapter and no registration shall be revoked until the registrant has been given the opportunity to appear for a hearing by the director.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-14.
Constitutionality.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter is for any reason judged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, that judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of this chapter but shall be confined in its operation
to the clause, sentence, paragraph or part of this chapter directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 165, § 1.

2-22-15.
Annual reports.

The registrant is required to submit an annual report of sales to the director. The composter shall submit payment to the director as follows:

Eight cents ($.08) per ton for class 1 general use;

Fifteen cents ($.15) per ton for class 2 use;

Twenty cents ($.20) per ton for class 3 use; and

Twenty-five cents ($.25) per ton for class 4 limited use.

History of Section.
P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 2.

2-22-16.
Quality assurance funds.

All funds received by the department under this chapter shall be deposited into the feed and fertilizer quality testing fund established under §

2-7-6(a)

and used for the express purpose of testing and assuring the soil amendment.

History of Section.
P.L. 1994, ch. 63, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 41.